California, session 20252026, AB1180.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 3104 is added to the Financial Code, to read:3104.SECTION 1. Section 3802 is added to the Financial Code, to read:3802. (a) The (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), in consultation with the Treasurer and the Controller, the department shall adopt regulations to allow any a payment required under this division to be made with digital financial assets. a stablecoin that is issued by a licensee of this division and that may be redeemed directly from the issuer.(2) The regulations required by paragraph (1) shall only allow payments made by an applicant or licensee to the department and shall not allow payments related to any enforcement measure taken pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3401).(3) The regulations required by paragraph (1) shall not allow a payment to be made with a stablecoin if the Controller, the Treasurer, or the department determines the payment would interfere or conflict with the requirements in any of the following:(A) Article 2 (commencing with Section 12320) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(B) Article 2 (commencing with Section 12410) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(C) Part 2 (commencing with Section 16300) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(b) On or before January 1, 2028, 2029, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, containing all of the following:(1) The number and value of cryptocurrency stablecoin transactions processed.(2) Technical and regulatory challenges encountered.(3)Recommendations(c) On or before January 1, 2028, the Treasurer and the Controller, in consultation with the department, shall submit a report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, containing recommendations for payments under other laws and to other state government governmental agencies to be made using digital financial assets. stablecoins.(d) The cost to the department of implementing and administering this section shall be recovered in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 3211.(e) For purposes of this section, “stablecoin” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3601.(c)(f) (1) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026. 2027.(2) This section shall be operative only until January 1, 2031, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.